Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-2206
Administrator; qualifications.

The administrator shall have (1) a bachelor's degree or higher degree in architecture from an accredited college or university and (2) at least five years of administrative experience in historic preservation and planning, design, and construction of major construction projects.

Laws 2004, LB 439, § 6.